Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Chapter 5. Office and Agent

§ 5.02.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A corporation may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

the name of the corporation;

the street address of its current registered office;

if the current registered office is to be changed, the street address of the new registered office;

the name of its current registered agent;

if the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent and the new agent’s written consent (either on the statement or attached to it) to the appointment; and

that after the change or changes are made, the street addresses of its registered office and the office of its registered agent will be identical.

If the street address of a registered agent’s office is changed, the registered agent may change the street address of the registered office of any corporation for which the registered agent is the registered agent by notifying the corporation in writing of the change and by signing (either manually or in facsimile) and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and recites that the corporation has been notified of the change.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 5.03.
Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign as registered agent by signing and delivering to the Secretary of State the original and two exact or conformed copies of a statement of resignation. The statement may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

After filing the statement, the Secretary of State shall mail one copy to the registered office (if not discontinued) and the other copy to the corporation at its principal office as shown in the most recent biennial report filed pursuant to section 16.22 of this title.

The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the 31st day after the date on which the statement is filed.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 5.04.
Service on corporation.

The corporation’s registered agent shall be an agent of such corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

Whenever a corporation shall fail to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this State, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the Secretary of State shall be an agent of such corporation upon whom any such process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the Secretary of State of any such process, notice, or demand shall be made by delivering to and leaving with him or her, or with any clerk having charge of the corporation department of his or her office, duplicate copies of such process, notice, or demand. In the event any such process, notice, or demand is served on the Secretary of State, he or she shall immediately cause one of the copies thereof to be forwarded by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the corporation at its registered office.

The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served upon the Secretary under this section, and shall record therein the time of such service and the Secretary’s action with reference thereto.

Nothing herein contained shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law, or by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.